Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.150

Liability for fault or misconduct.

Whenever any sheriff neglects to make due return of any writ or other process delivered to him or her to be executed, or is guilty of any default or misconduct in relation thereto, he or she shall be liable to fine or attachment, or both, at the discretion of the court, subject to appeal, such fine, however, not to exceed two hundred dollars; and also to an action for damages to the party aggrieved.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4057; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.150. Prior: Code 1881 s 2771; 1863 p 558 s 6; 1854 p 434 s 6; RRS s 4169.]